Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6295.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 27C PRIMARY CARE WORKFORCE RECRUITMENT GRANT PROGRAM Sec. 2751. (1) As used in this part: (a) "Eligible institution" means a medical school, a nursing school, or another educational institution that prepares students for a health profession in primary care. (b) "Fund" means the primary care workforce recruitment grant fund created in section 2757. (c) "Grant program" means the primary care workforce recruitment grant program created in section 2753. (d) "Primary care" means family practice, internal medicine, pediatrics, obstetrics, psychiatry, or emergency medicine. (2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code. Sec. 2753. (1) The primary care workforce recruitment grant program is created, to be administered by the department. The department shall do all of the following in implementing the grant program: (a) Award grants to eligible institutions for the purpose of promoting health professions in primary care to middle school and high school students in this state. (b) Publicize the availability of the grant program, in partnership with eligible institutions and other persons. (2) The department shall publish an annual report on the grant program and submit a copy of the report to the department, the governor, the standing committees in the senate and the house of representatives responsible for health policy, and the chairs of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, including the appropriations committee on the department's budget. The department shall also post the report on the department's website in an area available to the public. The report must include at least all of the following information: (a) The cost effectiveness of the grant program and how the department determined the cost effectiveness of the grant program. (b) The successes of the grant program and challenges of the grant program. (c) Recommendations on changes to the grant program. Sec. 2755. (1) The department may award a grant under this part to an eligible institution that meets the requirements established by the department by rule. (2) A person may apply for a grant under this part by completing an application on a form provided by the department. (3) As a condition of receiving a grant under this part, an eligible institution shall agree to promote health professions in primary care to middle school and high school students in this state. Sec. 2757. (1) The primary care workforce recruitment grant fund is created within the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (5) The department shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only for the purpose of providing grants under this part. Sec. 2759. The department shall promulgate rules to implement this part.